Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) To "credential" means to license, certify, or register an applicant.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(4) "Health profession" means a profession providing health services regulated under the laws of this state and under which laws this statute is specifically referenced.

(5) "Credential" means the license, certificate, or registration issued to a person.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 307; 1987 c 150 s 62.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.